District of Columbia statutes.
4-327

Optional contents of compacts.

A compact entered into pursuant to this subchapter may contain the following provisions in addition to those required pursuant to § 4-326.

(1)

Provisions establishing procedures for and entitlement to medical and other necessary social services for the child in accordance with applicable laws, even though the child and the adoptive parents are in a state other than the one responsible for or providing the services or the funds to defray part or all of the costs thereof; and

(2)

Any other provisions as may be appropriate or incidental to the proper administration of the compact.

June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 407, 47 DCR 2850